California statutes. Water Code
The board shall determine the amounts necessary to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year and shall fix the rate or rates of tax to be levied which will raise the amounts of money required by the district. These acts by the board are a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed. The amount of this levy shall not exceed the amounts permitted by any maximum property tax rate limitation in the Revenue and Taxation Code, provided, however, that if no tax was levied by the district for either the 1971–1972 of the 1972–1973 fiscal year, and the district incurred expenses in such years, which expenses were paid from revenues other than taxes, then the maximum levy shall not exceed fifty cents ($0.50) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

72094.

On or before September 1, the board shall certify to the board of supervisors and county auditor the tax rate or rates fixed for the district and shall furnish a statement of any delinquent and unpaid charges for water and other services, or either, requested in writing by the owner of the property that remain delinquent and unpaid for 60 days or more on July 1st.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 564, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

72095.

The county auditor shall compute and enter in the county assessment roll the respective sums to be paid as a district tax on the property in the district, using the rate or rates of levy as fixed by the board and the assessed value as found on the assessment roll for the property subject to the particular tax.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

72096.

Taxes for the payment of the interest on or principal of any bonded debt shall be levied on the property within the district, or improvement district therein, that is benefited by the bonded debt, as determined by the board in the resolution declaring the necessity to incur the debt. Taxes for other purposes of the district shall be levied on all property in the district or portion thereof subject to the particular tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72096.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a mobilehome which occupies a rental space and is not permanently attached to the land is not property subject to ad valorem property taxes for debt service of the district or of any improvement district therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72097.

All county officers charged with the duty of collecting taxes shall collect district taxes at the same time and in the same form and manner as county taxes are collected, and shall pay the collected district taxes to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72098.

Taxes for the payment of a bonded debt and the interest thereon shall be a lien on all the property benefited thereby as stated in the resolution of the board declaring the necessity to incur the debt. All taxes for other purposes of the district shall be a lien on all the property in the district subject to the particular tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72099.

Liens for district taxes, whether for payment of a bonded indebtedness and the interest thereon or for other purposes, shall be of the same force and effect as other liens for taxes, and their collection may be enforced by the same means as provided for the enforcement of liens for state and county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72100.

The amount of any charges for water and other services or either included in the statement of delinquent and unpaid charges pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 72094 shall be added to and become a part of the annual taxes next levied upon the property upon which the water for which the charges are unpaid was used and upon the property subject to the charges for any other district services and shall constitute a lien on that property as of the same time and in the same manner as does the tax lien securing such annual taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of municipal ad valorem taxes shall be applicable to such charges, except that if any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of such taxes would become delinquent, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the charges relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection. The county shall deduct from the charges collected an amount sufficient to compensate the county for costs incurred in collecting such delinquent and unpaid charges. The amount of such compensation shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors and the district’s board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

72101.

A district shall notify the holder of title to land whenever delinquent and unpaid charges for water and other services or either which could become a lien on such property pursuant to Section 72100 remain delinquent and unpaid for 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1211.)
-------------------------------------------

72102.

In case any charges for water or other services, or either, remain unpaid the amount of the unpaid charges may in the discretion of the district be secured at any time by filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county, a certificate specifying the amount of such charges and the name and address of the person liable therefor.

From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or afterwards, and before the lien expires, acquired by him. The lien has the force, priority, and effect of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the filing of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of such filing the lien shall be extended to the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 335.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Apportionment of Taxes in Multicounty Districts and Improvement Districts [72110. - 72112.]

72110.

If a district contains lands situated in more than one county, the duties imposed upon the board of supervisors and county officers by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 72090) of this part shall be performed by the board of supervisors and county officers of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72111.

In a district containing lands situated in more than one county, the auditor of each affected county shall immediately after equalization and not later than the 15th day of August of each year, prepare and deliver to the secretary of the district, or such other officer thereof as may be designated by the board, a certificate showing the assessed valuation of all property within the district lying within the county. Thereafter, the board shall make the certification and statement, and issue the directions, as required by Sections 72094 and 72095. After collection of taxes by the proper county officers at the rate specified, such officers shall pay the moneys received therefrom to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72112.

Whenever an improvement district within a municipal water district is itself located in two or more counties, the method and procedure for the apportionment of district taxes between counties shall apply to such improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Payments by Public Agencies in Lieu of Taxes [72125. - 72132.]

72125.

“Public agency,” as used in this chapter, means any city, county, district, other local authority or public body of, or within, this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

72126.

On or before July 1st of each year, a district by resolution may authorize public agencies, located wholly or partially within the boundaries of the district, to pay all or any portion of the taxes levied by the district for the fiscal year commencing on July 1st of such year. Following the adoption of such resolution, any public agency located wholly or partially within the boundaries of the district may, as provided in this chapter, utilize funds derived from the sale of water or other funds not appropriated to some other use to pay a district within whose boundaries such public agency is wholly or partially situated such amounts in avoidance of taxes of the district as may be determined annually by the governing body of such public agency. Any such payment shall be credited to the taxable property of the public agency within the district and shall be deducted from the amount of taxes which would otherwise be levied by the district against such property. If any such payment exceeds the amount of taxes which would otherwise have been levied against such property, the amount of such excess, with interest, shall be carried over and applied in reduction of taxes levied on such property during the ensuing year or years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

72127.

On or before the first day of September, in any year the governing body of a public agency located wholly or partially within a district may declare its intention to utilize its funds to pay the whole or a portion of the taxes to be next paid to such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

72128.

All such declarations shall be made by order and resolution of the governing body of the public agency and shall state that payment shall be made in cash directly to the district in equal installments on December 10th in the year of the declaration and on April 10th in the year next following.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

72129.

Immediately upon the adoption of such declaration a certified copy shall be filed by such public agency with the secretary of the district to whom the taxes would inure, the county assessor and county auditor of the county wherein the public agency is situated and the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

72130.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of such declaration, the board of directors of the district may reject such declaration whenever the public agency has, in the preceding five-year period, declared its intention to utilize its funds in lieu of taxes and has failed to meet its obligations thereunder in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

72131.

Upon receipt of a certifed copy of such declaration, the county assessor, county auditor, or other responsible officer shall reduce the amount of taxes to be collected within the boundaries of the public agency for the benefit of the district by the amount which the public agency has declared its intent to pay, provided, the board of directors of the district does not notify such officers of rejection of such declaration pursuant to Section 72130.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

72132.

A public agency which exercises its right to utilize its funds in avoidance of taxes shall retain its rights to state, county, or other public agency reimbursement to the same extent that the public agency would have enjoyed had the taxes of the district been carried on the county assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Chino Basin Production Assessments [72140. - 72146.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [72140. - 72140.2.]

72140.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Chino Basin Production Assessment Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72140.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Annual” or “year” means a calendar year unless the context indicates a contrary meaning.

(b) “Assessing district” means any Chino Basin district which levies a production assessment under this chapter.

(c) “Board” means the board of directors of the primary district.

(d) “Chino Basin” means the groundwater basin situated within the Counties of Los Angeles, Riverside, and San Bernardino and which is described in the complaint for general adjudication of water rights in the matter of Chino Basin Municipal Water District v. City of Chino, et al., San Bernardino Superior Court No. 164327, filed January 2, 1975.

(e) “Chino Basin districts” means the primary district, the Western Municipal Water District of Riverside County, and the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District, the boundaries of each of which incorporate land overlying, in part, the Chino Basin.

(f) “Fiscal year” means the period July 1 through June 30, following.

(g) “Groundwater” means water beneath the surface of the ground and within the zone of saturation.

(h) “Minimal pumper” means any person whose total production from the Chino Basin does not exceed 10 acre-feet per year.

(i) “Person” means any public agency or public corporation, or any private corporation, firm, partnership, limited liability company, individual, or group of individuals, excluding the State of California and its agencies.

(j) “Primary district” means the Chino Basin Municipal Water District, which overlies a majority of the Chino Basin.

(k) “Production” or “produce” means the extraction of groundwater by pumping or any other method, except for gravity flow tunnels which intercept the subsurface flow of defined streams.

(l) “Producer” means any person who produces groundwater within the Chino Basin, excluding minimal pumpers.

(m) “Secretary” means the secretary of the primary district.

(n) “Supplemental water” means water from the State Water Resources Development System.

(o) “Water producing facility” means any device or method, mechanical or otherwise, for the production of groundwater within the Chino Basin.

(p) “Annual report” means the report required of each producer pursuant to Section 72143.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 227.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

72140.2.

The powers conferred by this chapter are in addition to, and not in place of, any other powers conferred upon the Chino Basin districts. Production assessments levied pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed necessary to further the activities of the Chino Basin districts in the protection of the ground water supplies of the Chino Basin for the public health, safety, and welfare. Production assessments are authorized to be levied upon the production of ground water from the Chino Basin for the benefit of all members of the public who rely directly or indirectly upon such ground water supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessment [72141. - 72141.]

72141.

To accomplish the purposes of this chapter, the primary district shall cause a production assessment or assessments to be levied each year at a uniform annual rate of two dollars ($2) per acre-foot of production from the Chino Basin, or in such lesser amount as may be determined pursuant to Section 72142. The authorized purposes for such production assessments are as follows:

(a) To purchase supplemental water to be used in the aid of studies and investigations authorized under subdivision (b), provided that the total expenditures for such purpose from all production assessments levied pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).

(b) To pay the costs and expenses incurred during or after the 1974–75 fiscal year for studies and investigations, including systems analysis, to develop a management plan for the water resources of the Chino Basin, including studies and investigations incident to actions and proceedings authorized under subdivision (c).

(c) To pay costs and expenses incurred during or after the 1974–75 fiscal year for actions and proceedings authorized by the primary district under Sections 71751 and 71757 and related to the development and implementation of such water management plan for the Chino Basin.

(d) To pay costs and expenses incurred during or after the 1974–75 fiscal year for the administration of this chapter, including advisory committee expenses, and to pay or reimburse costs and expenses of the Chino Basin districts incurred for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Levy of Assessment [72142. - 72142.4.]

72142.

On or before 60 days after the effective date of this chapter, and on or before the third Wednesday in April of each year after 1975, the board shall adopt a budget and by resolution levy such two-dollar ($2)-per-acre-foot assessment, unless the board determines that the purposes of this chapter can be accomplished with a lesser assessment, in which case the board may, by resolution, levy such lesser assessment. Such assessment shall be applicable to all production within the Chino Basin during the fiscal year in which such assessment is levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72142.1.

Immediately after adopting its resolution levying the assessment, which levy shall thereupon be effective as to all production from the Chino Basin within the primary district, the board shall notify and direct the other Chino Basin districts to levy similar assessments on production from the Chino Basin within each Chino Basin district at an identical rate. The boards of directors of each Chino Basin district other than the primary district shall on or before 30 days after receipt of such notice levy such assessment against all production from the Chino Basin within its boundaries within 30 days after the final date for receipt of annual reports and the payments of assessments, all net assessment proceeds collected by any Chino Basin district, less all costs of administration and collection, shall be delivered to the primary district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72142.2.

After the levy of a production assessment pursuant to this chapter the Chino Basin districts shall give notice thereof to all affected producers within the Chino Basin, within each of their respective boundaries, which notice shall state the rate of each assessment and shall require filing of the annual report of each affected producer, together with payment of the assessment, by the deadline specified in Section 72143. The notice may be sent by postal card or by other first-class mail with postage prepaid by the assessing district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72142.3.

Payment of the assessment shall accompany the filing of the annual report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72142.4.

If any producer after having been given notice as required by Section 72142.2 fails to pay a production assessment when due, such producer shall become liable to the assessing district for interest at the rate of 1 percent per month on the delinquent amount of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reports [72143. - 72143.1.]

72143.

On or before 120 days after the effective date of this chapter, and on or before the last day of July of each year after 1975, each producer within the Chino Basin shall furnish the assessing district with an annual report of production for the preceding fiscal year, on a form to be prescribed by the board. On or before 150 days after the effective date of this chapter, and on or before the last day of August of each year after 1975, each Chino Basin district shall deliver a copy of such annual reports to the primary district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72143.1.

If any producer subject to production assessments, after having been given notice as required by Section 72142.2, fails to file an annual report on production, such producer shall, in addition to the liability for interest provided in Section 72142.4, become liable to the assessing district for a penalty of two dollars ($2) per acre-foot produced during the fiscal year subject to such report.

If the board of the assessing district has probable cause to believe that the production by any producer is unreported or, if reported, is substantially in excess of that disclosed by the annual report of such producer, such board shall cause an investigation and report to be made concerning such production. Such board shall determine and fix the correct amount of production for any such producer, not to exceed the maximum production capacity of such producer’s water producing facilities; provided, however, where a water measuring device is permanently attached thereto, the record of production as disclosed by such water measuring device shall be presumed to be accurate, and the burden shall be upon such board to establish to the contrary.

After such determination has been made by such board, a written notice thereof shall be mailed to the producer by such assessing district at his address as shown by the primary district’s records. Any such determination made by such board shall be conclusive on the producer, and production assessments based thereon, together with interest and penalties, shall be payable immediately, unless such producer shall file with such board within 10 days after the mailing of such notice a written protest setting forth the ground or grounds for protesting the amount of production so determined or the production assessment, interest, and penalties so levied thereon. Upon the filing of such protest, such board shall hold a hearing at which time the total amount of production and the production assessment thereon shall be determined, and the interest and penalties fixed, which action shall be conclusive if based upon substantial evidence. A notice of such hearing shall be mailed to the protestant at least 10 days before the date fixed for the hearing. Notice of the determination by such board shall be mailed to each protestant. Such producer shall have 20 days from the date of mailing of such notice to pay the production assessment, interest, and penalties so fixed by such board. Within 30 days after the conclusion of the proceedings under this section, such assessing district shall deliver a copy of the notice of the determination to the primary district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Advisory Committee [72144. - 72144.2.]

72144.

The board shall appoint an advisory committee representative of the various categories of water use and institutional concern, including each city which is a producer, each water district whose boundaries include lands within the Chino Basin, and representatives of water companies and industrial and agricultural interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72144.1.

The advisory committee shall organize, elect officers, and adopt reasonable rules for conduct of its affairs; provided, that all meetings of the committee shall be conducted in compliance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

72144.2.

The advisory committee shall review all proposed studies, programs, and expenditures of proceeds of production assessments under this chapter and shall advise and consult with the board in the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Remedies [72145. - 72145.]

72145.

Any assessing district may bring a suit in the court having jurisdiction against any producer for the collection of any delinquent production assessments, interest, or penalties. The court having jurisdiction of the suit may, in addition award interest, costs, and attorney’s fees on any judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Termination [72146. - 72146.]

72146.

The assessment authority conferred pursuant to this chapter shall not extend beyond fiscal year 1976–77 production, and the power to collect production assessments shall cease and terminate after exhaustion of all remedies of the assessing districts as to such 1976–77 production. Nothing in this section shall preclude the commitment or expenditure of assessment proceeds remaining after the termination of such assessment authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [72150. - 72303.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exclusion [72150. - 72151.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [72150. - 72151.]

72150.

Territory included within a district may be excluded from the district. When any part of the corporate area of a city is included in the territory proposed to be excluded from the district, the entire corporate area of the city, or part thereof, then included within the district shall be included in the territory proposed to be excluded from the district except that when the boundaries of the corporate area of a city are also within a metropolitan water district, a portion of such city may be excluded from a district if at the conclusion of the exclusion proceedings such portion of the city will still remain within the boundaries of such metropolitan water district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

72151.

The territory proposed to be excluded may consist of one or more parcels which need not be contiguous to each other and may consist of parcels situated in more than one county if the district contains such parcels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Automatic Exclusion of Cities [72280. - 72285.]

72280.

If, prior to the effective date of the formation of a municipal water district, any territory included therein is annexed to a metropolitan water district organized under the Metropolitan Water District Act, the governing body of the municipal water district, within 90 days after the effective date of the formation of such district, may adopt an ordinance which:

(a) Recites that the territory has been annexed to the metropolitan water district.

(b) Refers to the applicable statutes and to the date and place of the filing of the certificate or certificates evidencing such annexation.

(c) Describes the territory.

(d) Determines and declares that the territory is excluded from the municipal water district.

Such ordinance shall be effective immediately upon its adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72281.

The board or the secretary of the municipal water district shall file a certified copy of the ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 72280 with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72282.

Upon receipt of the certified copy of the ordinance, the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, issue his certificate reciting the passage of the ordinance and the exclusion of the area from the municipal water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72283.

A copy of the Secretary of State’s certificate shall be transmitted to and filed with the county clerk of the county in which the municipal water district is situated if the district is situated in a single county, or shall be submitted to and filed with the secretary if the district contains lands situated in more than one county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72284.

From and after the date of the Secretary of State’s certificate, the area described therein is excluded from, and no longer forms a part of, the municipal water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72285.

The taxable property within the excluded area shall remain subject to any taxes theretofore levied by the municipal water district and shall continue to be taxable by the municipal water district for the purpose of paying the bonded or other indebtedness of the municipal water district, if any, outstanding or contracted for at the time of such exclusion and until such bonded or other indebtedness is satisfied, to the same extent that such property would be taxable for such purpose if the exclusion had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Inclusion [72300. - 72303.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [72300. - 72303.]

72300.

Any portion of a county, or any city situated within such county, or both, may be added to a district. Such portion or city need not be within a county in which the existing district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72301.

The cities need not be contiguous, and the unincorporated territory, inhabited or uninhabited, may consist of one or more parcels which need not be contiguous to each other or to any such cities. The annexing area or areas need not be contiguous to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

72302.

Any district whose territory is included within a metropolitan water district may nonetheless annex territory outside of the metropolitan water district without the consent of, or necessity that such annexed land be included within, the metropolitan water district; but the district may not serve water purchased from the metropolitan water district to such territory outside of the boundaries of the metropolitan water district without the consent of the metropolitan water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 775.)
-------------------------------------------

72303.

Any district, the territory, or any portion thereof, of which is included within a metropolitan water district, shall be entitled, without penalty or sanction from the metropolitan water district, to purchase or acquire water to serve any territory within the district, whether or not the territory is within the metropolitan water district, from the following specified sources without the water being deemed an acquisition or purchase of water from the State Water Resources development system:

(a) Recycled water, as defined in Section 13050, regardless of the source of the water prior to its use and recycling.

(b) Water produced incidentally to the exercise of bona fide property rights to divert or pump local waters, regardless of the origin of the waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 367.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION OF IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS [72670. - 72741.2.]



  CHAPTER 1. Inclusion of Territory [72670. - 72711.]



  ARTICLE 1. Inclusion Proceedings Initiated by Petition [72670. - 72689.]

72670.

Any portion of a district, whether contiguous or not to an improvement district thereof, may be annexed to such improvement district in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72671.

Annexation proceedings may be initiated by petition. A petition, which may consist of any number of separate instruments, shall be filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72672.

The petition shall be signed by the holders of title to at least 60 percent of the land in the portion proposed to be annexed, which land shall have an assessed valuation of not less than 50 percent of the land proposed to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72673.

The petition for annexation shall contain all of the following:

(a) A description of the area proposed to be annexed. Such description may be made by reference to a map on file with the secretary of the district, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the area proposed to be annexed, or may be made in any other definite manner.

(b) The terms and conditions upon which the proposed area may be annexed as theretofore determined by resolution of the board.

(c) A prayer that the board declare such area to be annexed to the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72674.

The petition for annexation shall be accompanied by a certified check payable to the order of the district in a sufficient amount to reimburse the district for the expenses of processing and publishing the petition and preparing and making the filings required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72675.

Within 10 days of the date of the filing of the petition for annexation, the secretary shall examine the petition and determine whether it is signed by the required number of property owners. Upon request of the secretary, the board shall authorize him to employ persons specially for this purpose, in addition to the persons regularly employed in his office, and shall provide for their compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72676.

When the secretary has completed his examination of the petition for annexation, he shall attach to it his certificate, properly dated, showing the result of such examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72677.

If the secretary finds from the examination that the petition for annexation is signed by the requisite number of property owners he shall certify that the petition is sufficient. If he finds it is not so signed, he shall certify that the petition is insufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72678.

If the secretary certifies in his certificate that the petition for annexation is insufficient, the petition may be amended by filing a supplemental petition or petitions within 10 days of the date of such certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72679.

Within 10 days after the filing of any supplemental petition or petitions, the secretary shall examine them and certify to the result of such examination as provided in Sections 72675 to 72677, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72680.

After the time for filing supplemental petitions has expired and all supplemental petitions have been examined, if the secretary’s certificate shows that the petition for annexation is sufficient, the secretary shall cause notice of hearing on the petition to be published and posted without delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72680.1.

In the event the petition for annexation is signed by all of the holders of title of land in the portion proposed to be annexed, the board may proceed and act thereon without notice and hearing, but shall otherwise comply with the applicable provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

72681.

The text of the petition for annexation shall be published, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the time at which it is to be presented to the board, in at least one newspaper printed and published in the district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district, together with a notice stating the time and place of the meeting at which the petition will be presented. If the petition is contained upon one or more instruments, only one copy of the petition need be published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72682.

No more than five of the names attached to the petition for annexation need appear in the publication of the petition and notice, but the number of signers shall be stated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72683.

The petition and notice shall also be posted in three public places in the improvement district and three public places in the area proposed to be annexed at least two weeks prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72684.

The board shall proceed to hear the petition at the time and place fixed therefor, and any person residing within the district or improvement district or owning taxable property in the district or improvement district may appear and be heard at such hearing. Such hearing may be continued from time to time by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72685.

At the conclusion of the hearing, if the board finds and determines from the evidence presented at the hearing that the area proposed to be annexed to an improvement district will be benefited thereby, and that the improvement district to which the area proposed to be annexed will also be benefited thereby and will not be injured thereby, the board may, by resolution, approve the annexation.

The resolution shall describe the annexed territory, which may be made by reference to a map on file with the secretary, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the annexed area, or may be made in any other definite manner. The resolution shall also state the terms and conditions of annexation as theretofore determined by resolution of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72686.

From and after the date of the adoption of the resolution approving the annexation, the area named therein is added to and forms a part of the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72687.
